Maryland, session 2025, SB0178.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – Property
9–303.
(b) (3) (i) The governing body of Anne Arundel County or of a municipal
corporation in Anne Arundel County may grant, by law, a property tax credit under this
section against the county or municipal corporation tax imposed on real property that is
owned by [Arundel Habitat for Humanity, Inc., and is located at 8101 Fort Smallwood
Road, Baltimore, Maryland or 8104 Parkway Drive, Baltimore, Maryland] HABITAT FOR
HUMANITY OF THE CHESAPEAKE, INCORPORATED.
(ii) The governing body of Anne Arundel County or of a municipal
corporation in Anne Arundel County may provide, by law, for:
1. the amount, terms, scope, and duration of the credit
granted under this paragraph; and
2. any other provision necessary to administer the credit
granted under this paragraph.
– 1 –

Ch. 179 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after June 30, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, April 22, 2025.
– 2 –